src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in the Apurinã language are numbers.

LEXICON Numerals
epi+v1:epi Numerals_2/3 ; ! 2
epi+v2:ipi Numerals_2/3 ; ! 2
hãty+v1+Num+Msc:hãty    Cases   ; ! 1
hãty+v2+Num+Msc:ãty    Cases   ; ! 1
hãty+v1+Num+Fem:hãtu    Cases   ; ! 1
hãty+v2+Num+Fem:ãtu    Cases   ; ! 1

LEXICON Numerals_2/3
hãty+Num+Msc:-hãty    Cases   ; ! -1
hãty+Num+Fem:-hãtu    Cases   ; ! -1
+Num: Cases ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
